apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="/erguir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>erguiríamos</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiría</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiríais</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguirías</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguirían</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiría</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiremos</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiré</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiréis</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguirás</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguirán</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguirá</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiéremos</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiere</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiereis</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguieres</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguieren</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiere</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiendo</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiéndo</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguimos</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguí</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguisteis</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguiste</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguieron</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguió</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguid</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguid</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguí</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__suscribí"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguíd</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergue</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yérgue</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguir</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguir</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguír</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguíamos</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguía</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguíais</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguías</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguían</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguía</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiéramos</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguiésemos</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiera</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguiese</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguierais</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguieseis</l><r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguieras</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguieses</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguieran</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguiesen</l> <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irguiera</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irguiese</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguidas</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguida</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguidos</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguido</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguimos</l>  <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irgo</l>      <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergo</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erguís</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irgues</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergues</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerguen</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irgue</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergue</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irgamos</l>   <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irga</l>      <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerga</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irgáis</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irgas</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergas</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irgan</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yergan</l>    <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irga</l>      <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerga</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>írgan</l>     <r>erguir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>

<e lm="erguir"><par n="/erguir__vblex"/></e>
